Florida, session 2026, HB1061.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Present subsections (2), (3), and (4) of
section 39.806, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
subsections (3), (4), and (5), respectively, and a new
subsection (2) is added to that section, to read:
39.806 Grounds for termination of parental rights.—
(2) A court may not deny or otherwise restrict a parent's
custody of a child or the parent's visitation rights or
parenting time with a child based solely on the parent's status
as a qualified patient pursuant to s. 381.986. There is no
presumption of neglect or child endangerment based solely on the
parent's status as a qualified patient pursuant to s. 381.986.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1061-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1061 2026
In determining the best interests of the child with respect to
custody or dependency, this section applies.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1061-00